apertium-bhw.bhw.lexd
:[-pair]    <px1sg><du>:>si[-pair]
:[-nonpair]   <px1sg><sg>:>ri[-nonpair]
:[-pair]    <px2sg><du>:>m>si[-pair]
:[-nonpair]   <px2sg><sg>:>m>ri[-nonpair]
:[-pair]    <px3sg><du>:>si[-pair]
:[-nonpair]   <px3sg><sg>:>ri[-nonpair]
:ku>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px1duinc><du>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:ku>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px1duinc><pc>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:ku>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px1duinc><pl>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:nu>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px1duex><du>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:nu>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px1duex><pc>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:nu>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px1duex><pl>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:mu>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px2du><du>:>m>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:mu>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px2du><pc>:>m>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:mu>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px2du><pl>:>m>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:su>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px3du><du>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:su>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px3du><pc>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:su>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px3du><pl>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:sko>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px3pc><du>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:sko>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px3pc><pc>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:sko>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px3pc><pl>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:ko>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px1plinc><du>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:ko>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px1plinc><pc>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:ko>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px1plinc><pl>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:nko>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px1duex><du>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:nko>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px1duex><pc>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:nko>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px1duex><pl>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:mko>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px2pl><du>:>m>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:mko>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px2pl><pc>:>m>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:mko>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px2pl><pl>:>m>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:si>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px3plan><du>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:si>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px3plan><pc>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]
:si>[-pair,-nonpair]       <px3plan><pl>:>s>na[-pair,-nonpair]



LEXICON Adverb

wer<adv>:wer #again
kwar<adv>:kwar #already
kaku<adv>:kaku #very
monda<adv>:monda #only
sampe<adv>:sampe #then
ba<adv>:ba #not
ido<adv>:ido #then
arwo<adv>:arwo #morning
ak<adv>:ak #also
insape<adv>:insape #then


LEXICON Aux
nari<aux>:nari #will

LEXICON Pronoun
aya<prn><pers><p1><sg>:aya
aw<prn><pers><p2><sg>:aw
aw<prn><pers><p2><sg>:au # Dir/LR
i<prn><pers><p3><sg>:i
ku<prn><pers><p1><du><inc>:ku
nu<prn><pers><p1><du><ex>:nu
mu<prn><pers><p2><du>:mu
su<prn><pers><p3><du>:su
sko<prn><pers><p3><pc>:sko
ko<prn><pers><p1><pl><inc>:ko
inko<prn><pers><p1><pl><ex>:inko
mko<prn><pers><p2><pl>:mko
si<prn><pers><p3><pl><an>:si
na<prn><pers><p3><pl><inan>:na


LEXICON PostVerb
wark<pv>:wark #guard, block
pum<pv>:pum #push forward
arok<pv>:arok #diagonal
karandir<pv>:karandir #bordered
karis<pv>:karis #side
fadas<pv>:fadas #on one's back
papark<pv>:papark #curled up
pambar<pv>:pambar #turn over
karapr<pv>:karapr #folded

LEXICON Fill
o:o
e:e
u:u
yo:yo


LEXICON Interjection
ba:ba #oh, exclamation
boo:boo #oh, exclamation
o:o #oh, exclamation
o:o
e:e
u:u
a:a
yo:yo
ari:ari #please, exclamation


LEXICON Punctuation

.<sent>:.
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
\:<sent>:\:
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:? 
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/


# Resources:
# https://github.com/apertium/lexd/blob/master/Usage.md
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
# https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
# https://github.com/hfst/
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
